Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.210

Federal cooperative extension fund.

There shall be in the state treasury a fund known as the federal cooperative agricultural extension fund, and all moneys paid into the state treasury for, or to the credit of, the Smith-Lever and Capper-Ketcham funds shall be placed in the federal cooperative agricultural extension fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.210. Prior: 1935 c 63 s 1; RRS s 5536-4.]